Utah statutes.
53B-16-401.   Definitions.
As used in this part:
(1)  "Cooperating employer" means a public or private entity which, as part of
a work experience and career exploration program offered through an
institution of higher education, provides interns with training and work
experience in activities related to the entity's ongoing business activities.
(2)  "Institution of higher education" means any component of the state system
of higher education as defined under Section 53B-1-102 which is authorized by
the State Board of Regents to offer internship programs, and any private
institution of higher education which offers internship programs under this
part.
(3)  "Intern" means a student enrolled in a work experience and career
exploration program under Section 53B-16-402 which is sponsored by an
institution of higher education, involving both classroom instruction and work
experience with a cooperating employer, for which the student receives no
compensation.
(4)  "Internship" means the work experience segment of an intern's work
experience and career exploration program sponsored by an institution of
higher education, performed under the direct supervision of a cooperating
employer.
